Utah statutes.
63L-5-301.   Remedies.

(1)  A person whose free exercise of religion has been substantially burdened by a government entity in violation of Section 63L-5-201 may bring an action in the district court of the county where the largest portion of the property subject to the land use regulation is located.

(2)  Any person who asserts a claim or defense against a government entity under this chapter may request:

(a)  declaratory relief;

(b)  temporary or permanent injunctive relief to prevent the threatened or continued violation; or

(c)  a combination of declaratory and injunctive relief.

(3)  A person may not bring an action under this chapter against an individual, other than an action against an individual acting in the individual's official capacity as an officer of a government entity.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

